Illinois, session 104th, HB4018.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Property Tax Relief and Fairness Referendum Act of 2026. 6    Section 5. Referendum. The State Board of Elections shall 7cause a statewide advisory question of public policy to be 8submitted to the voters at the general election to be held on 9November 3, 2026. The question shall appear in the following 10form: 11    "Shall Illinois adopt for all taxing districts a general 12    homestead exemption that allows for a reduction of up to 13    $25,000 of the equalized assessed value of a property 14    before property taxes are calculated and, the year after a 15    property qualifies for the general homestead exemption, 16    cap the increase in the equalized assessed value of the 17    property at no more than 3% or the increase in the Consumer 18    Price Index, whichever is lower?  19    For the purpose of this advisory question, "Consumer Price 20    Index" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor 21    Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that   HB4018- 2 -LRB104 12618 SPS 23290 b1    measures the average change in prices of goods and 2    services purchased by all urban consumers, United States 3    city average, all items, 1982-84 = 100." 4    The votes on the question shall be recorded as "Yes" or 5"No". 6    Section 10. Certification. The State Board of Elections 7shall immediately certify the question set forth in Section 5 8to be submitted to the voters of the entire State to each 9election authority in Illinois. 10    Section 15. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 112027.